Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 5. Outside Aid

§ 4931.
Source of funds.

Any union municipal district may accept, receive, and disburse in furtherance of the duties and functions, any funds, grants, and services made available by the State of Vermont and its agencies, the federal government and its agencies, any municipality or other governmental unit whether or not a member of the district, or private or civic sources.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4932.
Technical assistance.

The State and all departments, boards, bureaus, commissions, and other agencies thereof are hereby authorized and empowered, within the limitations of the constitution, to furnish and make available services, assistance, funds, property, and other incentives to any two or more municipalities participating in a union municipal district or interlocal contract so as to effectuate economy or simplification in the administration or financing thereof.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4933.
Municipal contributions.

Each municipality that is a party to an interlocal contract shall have authority to appropriate funds for the purpose of the contract and may also levy taxes and issue bonds for the payment of the appropriation as a special purpose. Services of personnel, use of equipment and office space, and other services may be accepted from contracting municipalities either in addition to or as part of their financial support.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 197

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4934.
Repealed.
1973, No. 250 (Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. July 1, 1974.